Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1304
Carrier enforcement officers; transfer; retirement options.

(1) Carrier enforcement officers described in subdivision (2)(b) of section 60-1303 who, on or after July 20, 2002, are transferred to the Nebraska State Patrol and become officers of the Nebraska State Patrol with the powers and duties prescribed in sections 81-2001 to 81-2009 shall, within ninety days of transfer, elect to participate in the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System or elect to remain members of the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska.

(2) An officer who elects to become a member of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System pursuant to this section shall (a) receive eligibility and vesting credit pursuant to subsection (3) of section 81-2016 for his or her years of participation in the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska, (b) be vested in the employer account with the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska regardless of his or her period of participation in the State Employees Retirement System, and (c) be treated for all other purposes of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act as a new member of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System.

(3) Transferring participation from the State Employees Retirement System of the State of Nebraska to the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System pursuant to this section does not constitute a termination for purposes of the State Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 2002, LB 470, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB198, § 6.

Nebraska State Patrol Retirement Act, see section 81-2014.01.